Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-614.01
Continuous alcohol monitoring device, defined.

Continuous alcohol monitoring device means a portable device capable of automatically and periodically testing and recording alcohol consumption levels and automatically and periodically transmitting such information and tamper attempts regarding such device, regardless of the location of the person being monitored.

Laws 2006, LB 925, § 6.